test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-raksa_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - ráksá: # á-stems
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom: ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen: ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc: ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill: rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc: ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com: rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe: rávsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess: ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom: ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: ráávsái
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc: ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill: rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc: ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com: rávsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe: rávsáittáá
    
